Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 9. Surface Areas.

§ 45.2-764.
Housekeeping; noxious fumes.

Good housekeeping shall be practiced in and around every building, shaft, slope, yard, or other area of a mine. Such practice includes cleanliness, orderly storage of materials, and the removal of possible sources of injury, such as stumbling hazards, protruding nails, broken glass, and possible falling and rolling materials.

Painting or conducting any operation that creates noxious fumes shall be performed only in a well-ventilated atmosphere.

Every surface mine structure, enclosure, or other facility shall be maintained in good repair.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-85.5, 45-85.8; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-34, 45.1-37; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.236; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-765.
Lighting.

Lights shall be provided as needed in or on a surface mine structure, enclosure, or other facility.

Each road, path, or walk outside of a structure, enclosure, or other facility shall be kept free from obstructions and shall be well-illuminated if it is used at night.

History.

1966, c. 594, § 45.1-38; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.237; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-766.
Flammable or combustible materials.

Oil, grease, and any similar flammable or combustible material shall be kept in a closed container, separate from other materials, so as to prevent any fire hazard to nearby buildings or mines. If oil, grease, or any similar flammable material is stored in a building, the building or room in which it is stored shall be of fireproof construction and well-ventilated.

Any oily rag, oily waste, or wastepaper shall be kept in a closed metal container until removed for disposal.

The area within 100 feet of each mine opening shall be kept free of flammable or combustible material; however, this provision shall not apply to the temporary storage of not more than a one-day’s supply of such material.

Every oxygen or acetylene bottle shall be (i) secured when not in use and (ii) stored with its cap in place in a rack constructed and designated for the storage of such bottles. Smoking shall be prohibited in any place where such materials are stored. Signs indicating that smoking is prohibited in the area shall be posted.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.9; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-39; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.238; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-767.
Hazardous crane operations.

A crane operator shall at all times during any hazardous crane operation maintain visual or auditory communication with all persons involved in such crane operation.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-36; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.239; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-768.
Controlling dust at the surface.

In each surface structure, enclosure, or facility at any excessively dusty mine, every electric motor, switch, lighting fixture, and control shall be protected by dust-tight construction.

Each surface structure and piece of equipment shall be kept free of coal dust accumulations.

If mining operations raise an excessive amount of dust into the air, such dust shall be allayed at its sources by the use of water, water with a wetting agent added to it, or another effective method.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-77, 45-85.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-34, 45.1-67; 1978, cc. 120, 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.240; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-769.
Scaffolding and overhead protection.

Proper scaffolding or proper overhead protection shall be provided (i) where repairs are being made to a facility or (ii) where equipment or material is being used or transported overhead.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-34; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.241; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-770.
Welding and cutting.

No welding or cutting with arc or flame shall be done in an excessively dusty atmosphere or dusty location. Firefighting apparatus shall be readily available when such welding or cutting is performed.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-34; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.242; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-771.
Fire prevention and fire control.

The provisions of Article 5 (§

45.2-912

et seq.) of Chapter 9 shall apply with respect to any requirement for firefighting equipment, duties in the event of a fire, or fire precautions at any surface area of an underground coal mine.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-14.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.243; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-772.
Surface equipment.

The provisions of Article 6 (§

45.2-915

et seq.) of Chapter 9 shall apply with respect to equipment at any surface area of an underground coal mine.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.244; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-773.
Travel ways and loading and haulage areas.

The provisions of Article 7 (§

45.2-922

et seq.) of Chapter 9 shall apply with respect to any travel way, loading area, or haulage area at the surface of an underground coal mine.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.245; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-774.
Electricity.

The provisions of Article 9 (§

45.2-926

et seq.) of Chapter 9 shall apply with respect to any power line, circuit, transformer, or other electrical equipment at any surface area of an underground coal mine.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.246; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-775.
Surface blasting.

The provisions of Article 10 (§

45.2-931

et seq.) of Chapter 9 shall apply with respect to explosives or blasting at any surface area of an underground coal mine.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.247; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-776.
Ground control.

The provisions of Article 11 (§

45.2-934

) of Chapter 9 shall apply with respect to any pit, highwall, wall, bank, or bench associated with any coal mining activity conducted at any surface area of an underground coal mine.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.248; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.